Utah statutes.
17B-1-108 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Restrictions on local district procurement of architect-engineer services.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Architect-engineer services" means those professional services within the scope of the practice of architecture as defined in Section 58-3a-102.

(b)  "Engineer services" means those professional services within the scope of the practice of professional engineering as defined in Section 58-22-102.

(2)  When a local district elects to obtain architect services or engineering services by using a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its competitive procurement process:

(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal in response to the local district's competitive procurement process; and

(b)  the local district may not award a contract to perform the architect services or engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a higher education entity or any part of one.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-6-104(3)(d), each local district board that engages the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor and considers more than one such professional for the engagement:

(a)  shall consider, as a minimum, in the selection process:

(i)  the qualifications, experience, and background of each firm submitting a proposal;

(ii)  the specific individuals assigned to the project and the time commitments of each to the project; and

(iii)  the project schedule and the approach to the project that the firm will take; and

(b)  may engage the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor based on the criteria under Subsection (3)(a) rather than solely on lowest cost.

